Oklahoma, session 2026, SB532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 199.10, as


amended by Section 7, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 199.10), is amended to read as follows:


Section 199.10. A. All licenses issued under the provisions of


the Oklahoma Cosmetology and Barbering Act shall be issued for a


period of one (1) year. The expiration date of the license shall be


the last day of the month in which the applicant’s birthday falls.


The public display of a licensee’s personal residential address on


the face of any license issued pursuant to the provisions of the


Oklahoma Cosmetology and Barbering Act shall be prohibited on and

Req. No. 20 Page 1


after July 1, 2016, and such personal address information, if


publicly displayed on a valid license, may be redacted by the


licensee until the license is renewed and no longer bears his or her


personal residential address.


B. 1. Beginning January 1, 2026, as a condition of renewal or


reactivation of the license, each licensee shall submit to the State


Board of Cosmetology and Barbering evidence of completion of twelve


(12) hours of continuing education courses approved by the Board,


within the twenty-four (24) months immediately preceding the term


for which the license is to be issued.


2. The Board shall promulgate rules for subjects to be included


in the continuing education. Each licensee shall be required to


complete and include as part of the requirements of the continuing


education a specified number of required subjects as prescribed by


rule.


C. Applications for renewal must be made on or before the last


day of the month in which the applicant’s birthday falls, and shall


be accompanied by the appropriate fees.


C. D. Any person who fails to renew the license within the


required time may make application for renewal at any time within


five (5) years from the expiration date of the license by paying the


regular renewal license fee and a late fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00),


which becomes due two (2) months after the expiration date.



Req. No. 20 Page 2


D. E. Any person who fails to renew within the required time


may make application with subsequent renewal and penalty fees.


E. F. Before a person may take an examination to renew an


expired license after a period of five (5) years, such person shall


register in a cosmetology or barber school for the given number of


review hours in accordance with the following timetable and schedule


based upon the type of license held.


Expired Five Review


License Type Years or More Hours Required


Basic Cosmetologist 250 hours


Barber 250 hours


Master Cosmetology


Instructor 100 hours


Master Barber


Instructor 100 hours


Facial/Esthetics


Instructor 100 hours


Manicurist/Nail


Technician


Instructor 100 hours


Manicurist 100 hours


Facial Operator 100 hours





Req. No. 20 Page 3


F. G. Each person holding a license shall notify the Board of


any change in the mailing address of such person within thirty (30)


days after any change.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-20 CAD 1/19/2025 5:38:10 AM





































Req. No. 20 Page 4